Illinois, session 104th, HB790.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Massage Therapy Practice is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 57/1)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Massage Therapy Practice Act.10(Source: P.A. 102-20, eff. 1-1-22.)